Wisconsin, session 2025, SB270.
do enact as follows:SB270,1Section 1. 5.06 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:5.06 (8) Any election official or complainant who is aggrieved by an order issued under sub. (6) may appeal the decision of the commission to circuit court for the county where the official conducts business or the complainant resides no later than 30 days after issuance of the order. Pendency of an appeal does not stay the effect of an order unless the court so orders. A complainant shall be considered aggrieved under this subsection regardless of whether the complainant has suffered an injury to a legally recognized interest and may appeal any order issued under sub. (6) that dismisses the complaint or otherwise does not grant the relief requested in the complaint. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb270 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb270 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB270 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB270 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB270: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting